Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.495

Directors—Election—Meetings—Quorum—Oath—Vacancies.

(1) Every converted savings bank shall be managed by not less than five directors, except that a bank having a capital of fifty thousand dollars or less may have only three directors. Directors shall be elected by the stockholders and hold office for one year and until their successors are elected and have qualified. In the first instance the directors shall be those named in the articles of incorporation and afterwards, those elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders to be held at least once each year on a day to be specified by the converted savings bank's bylaws but not later than May 15th of each year. If for any cause an election is not held at that time, it may be held at an adjourned meeting or at a subsequent meeting called for that purpose in the manner prescribed by the corporation's bylaws. Each director shall be a resident of a state of the United States. The directors shall meet at least nine times each year and whenever required by the director. A majority of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. At all stockholders' meetings, each share shall be entitled to one vote, unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise. Any stockholder may vote in person or by written proxy.

(2) If the board of directors consists of nine or more members, in lieu of electing the entire number of directors annually, the converted savings bank's articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that the directors be divided into either two or three classes, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, the term of office of directors of the first class to expire at the first annual meeting of shareholders after their election, that of the second class to expire at the second annual meeting after their election, and that of the third class, if any, to expire at the third annual meeting after their election. At each annual meeting after such classification, the number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of such meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting, if there are two classes, or until the third succeeding annual meeting, if there are three classes. A classification of directors shall not be effective prior to the first annual meeting of shareholders.

(3) Each director, so far as the duty devolves upon him or her, shall diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the corporation and shall not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated any provision of law applicable to the corporation.

(4) A vacancy occurring in the board of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors. A director elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the unexpired term of the director's predecessor in office. A directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board of directors for a term of office continuing only until the next election of directors by the shareholders.

[ 1994 c 256 s 110; 1994 c 92 s 403; 1985 c 56 s 29; 1983 c 44 s 3; 1981 c 85 s 98.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 403 and by 1994 c 256 s 110, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.